tex/ukrhyph/ukrhypst.pat.txt
.ак3р
.ана1л
.ані1
.анія2
.ант2
.ап3р
.ас3т
.бра1л
.вз2
.ви1
.вик2
.вис2
.виш2к
.ві4л3л
.вк2
.вм2
.впіз3
.вс2
.вст2
.вт2
.го2ф
.дж2
.ді1с
.до3в2ч
.дос2
.еле1о
.ес1т
.завж2
.заї2
.зб2
.зд2
.зов2с
.зо2о
.зо1с
.іг1р
.інф2
.іп3р
.іс3
.їда1
.йш2
.ле1о
.ле2п3р
.ль2
.мов3ч
.мо2к
.мс2
.на3в
.нав2ч
.наг4
.нас2
.не3в2
.не1с2
.ні2тр
.нія2
.нок1
.нос1т
.об1р
.од3в
.од3р
.ок1л
.ок3р
.оп2л
.оп3р
.ос1в
.ос3л
.ос1м
.ос1п
.ос3т
.ост1р
.от3в
.ох3в
.підоз2
.піз3
.по3д
.пої2
.по1с
.пос2то
.пот3во
.прик2
.прис2
.пх2
.ре2й
.рек1л
.ри2пл
.ру2ц
.се1с
.ск2
.сп4
.ст4
.сток2
.сухо2с
.ти2гр
.тк2
.тран2с
.три1
.трис2
.тх2
.ть2
.уг2
.уд2р
.уе2
.ул2
.ум2
.уп2
.ус2к
.ус2те
.ут2
.уш2
.ць2
.ча2є
а1а
аа2к
аа2л
а1б
абі1о
2або
або1с2
аб1р
абс1т
а3бу
а2бц
а3в2б
а1в2в
ав2га
ав2ж
а3вз2
ав2зя
ави2кл
ави2х
а1ві
ав3л
ав2ми
авм3р
а3в2ну
а1во1
авоз2
авп3р
а1вси
а1всі
авс1т
авт1р
а1ву
а3вх
ав2чо
ав2чус
а1г
а2гв
а4г3ла
а3гло
а2гн
а1ґ
аґ3р
ад1в
ад2зе
адіс1л
а2дм
адо2ст
а1дц
а2дця.
а1дю
а1е
ае2л
аеро1с
аес1
а1є
а2єс
а1ж
а2жц
а1з
аза2х3
аз2в
а2зг
а2зл
а2зм
азо1с
аз2р
а1і
а1ї
аї2ди
аї2ді
аката1
ак1в
акро1
а2кт
а1ла
ал3лє
ало3в2
а1лу
аль3в
1алюм
а1ля
а1м
2амаг
амо3з
амо1с2
а2мр
а2н1а2ме
ане2в
аніс2к
аніт2р
2анос
ан1о2те
ан2сп
ан2сур
а1ньк
а2н'
а1о
ао2д
ао2п
аос1
ао2те
ао2х
ао2ч
ао2щ
а1п
апідо2
апо3вз
апо2х
а2п3с
а2пф
а1ра
ар2ве
ар2ву
арей2ц
аре1о
ар3кс
ар3кш
ароо3к
ар3тс
асинх3
ас2к3р
ас2лі
ас2лов
ас2на
а2сни
ас2пр
ас1тн
аст1р
ас1тру
а2сть
а2стю
асу2п3
а1т
1атак
2атер
аті1о
а2тк
а2тл
а2тн
ато2п
а2т1р
а3троє
а2тс
а3ту
а2тф
ат3ха
а2тц
а1у
ау2в
ау2му
ау2че
а1ф
а2фл
а2фн
2ах
ах2в
ах3ви
ах2ло
а1ц
1ацеп
а1ч
а2чл
а2шл
а1ш2м
а1щ
а1ю1
а1я
ая2в
аяно2
1ба
ба2бл
ба2бр
ба2гл
ба2гр
ба1д
бак1л
бас1т
б1б2
2б1в
бви2кл
б1г2
б1ґ
б1д2
1бе
бе2з1а2
без3д
бе2зн
бе2з1ос
бе2з1у
бе2са
бес2ка
б1ж
б1з
1би
би2вч
бид2в
бис1
би2тв
би3х2
2бия
1бі
бі2гл
бі1йд
бі1й2т
бі1й2ш
бі3кр
бі3ллю
біль1
бі2он
бі1осу
бі1от
бі1п
бі1р2в
бі1т2не
бі1т2ну
2б1к
б1л
б2лиск
б2лисн
2блі
б2лок
б2ль
б1м
2б1н
1бо
боа2
бо2вв
бо2вс
бог2
боз2б
бо1з2в
бо2зн
2борд
боф2
б1п
бпри2
2бр.
б1раз
б1рам
б1рані
1б2рес
1брех
б2рід
брі1о
2брс
б2рух
б2рюх
б3ря
2б3с
бс2к
бс2те
бс2ти
бс2то
бст1р
4бсь
2б1т
бти2т
1бу
б1х
б1ц
б1ч
2б1ш
бш2л
б1щ
1бю
1б'
б'1ї2
1ва
ва2бл
ва2бр
ва2г1р
2вап
ва2пл
ва2пн
вас1т
3ваті
2в1б
вб2г
4в3бе
3в2бив
3в2бир
в2б2л
в3бн
вб2р
вв2
в2ве
в2ви
в1ві
вві2г3
ввій1
вві3л
ввіп1
ввіп3хн
ввір3в
в3вл
2в1г2
1вга
вг3не
вд2
в2дав
в2дад
в2дал
в2дам
в2дас
в2диб
в3дн
в2дог
вдо2с
вдос3т
в1др
вд3ри
в1дю
1в2дя
1ве
3вей
ве1о
2верд
ве2сл
3веч
2в1ж
в3жд
в3жк
в3жн
2в1з
вза2к3
вз2г
3взд2
в3зк
4взо
в2зь
1ви
виб2
ви3в2ч
ви3г2
ви2дц
виз1в
ви3п2
вис2к
вис2л
вис2п
вис2с
вит2в
вит2р
вих2в
ви2цв
ви3ш2ка
вия2
ві2ак
ві2ам
ві2ато
ві2ац
в2ів
ві2д1ж
відст2
1віє
1віж
ві1йд
ві1йти
ві1йш
3вік
ві1м
ві1о
ві1сс
1віу
1вію
1вія
2в1й
2в1к
вк2р
в3кс
2в1л
3в2ла
в3ла.
2вма
в2ман
1в2ме
1вми
в3ми.
3вмі
вм2л
в3м2н
1вмр
в1му
2в1н
вна2к1
вна2с3
вно1сти
1во.
во1бр
во3в2ж
во2вч
во2гн
во2єв
воє2д
во1з2в
во1з2м
во1зне
вої2д
1волящ
вома1
воо2
воп2
3вора
3вори.
вос2л
во1сп
вос1т
во2х1а2
в1п
в2пев
впі2в1
впі1й
вп2л
вп3лю
вп3ля
вп2н
впос3
впо2ш3
впри2сн
в3пт
в1р
2вр.
в3ра.
2вре
2ври
2врі
в2рож
врос1
в2рот
в3рс
2вру
2врю
1вря
в1с
3в2се1
всеозб2
всес2
в2сід
1вс2к
вс2л
вс2м
2всн
2в2сть
2всь
в2сю
в2сяк
2в1т
4вти
вти2з
вт2к2
вт3ка
вто1с2
вть2
в2тям
ву2час
в1ф
вф1р
2в1х
вхи2
вх2р
2в1ц
2вч.
в2чає
в2чал
в2чаю
вч2в
2вче
2вчий
в2чит
в2чишс
2вчі
2в3чк
2в3чн
1вчо
2вчу
2вчю
2в1ш
3вшп
2в1щ
1вю1
1в'2
в'ї2д
1га
га2бр
гаво2с
га2зд
га2пл
гас1т
гато1
2г1б
г1ві
г1во
2г1д
1ге
ге1дзе
гено1
геої2
ге3ро
2г1з
1ги
1гі
гі2гр
гі3є
2г1к
2г1ла
3г2лав
2глив
г2ліж
2глод
г2лот
г1ляв
1гляд
1глян
г1ляр
г1лят
2г1м
г1н
гне1с
г2нил
1гні
гніт2р
1гно
г3нов
г2ноє
г2ною
г3нц
2гню
2гня
1го
го3в2к
голої2
гос1
гос2в
2гр.
1гра
г1рац
гре2л
1г2реч
г2рі
1гріт
г1с
гск2
гс1т
2г3т
1гу
гу2льц
гус1т
2г1ц
2г1ш2
ґа2з
ґ2в
ґе1дзе
2ґ1з
2ґ1л
ґо2л
ґ2р
ґу1
ґу2льц
1да
да2бр
да2гр
д1б2
дв2
дви2кл
дви2т3
д1ві
д3вл
дво1с2
двоя2
д1вч
д1вя
д1г2
д1ґ
2д3д2
ддо2с3
1де
де2вр
де1г
де2зі
де2зо
де1к2в
де1кл
де1ол
де1пл
де1стр
де3ф2
де1х2
1дж
2дж.
дж2б
д2жі
д2жо
дз2
2дз.
д1зв
1дзев
д2зи
д1зн
д2зу
1д2зя
1ди
ди2бл
ди2зн
ди2п
ди3п2т
2дисв
ди2с3м
дист2
дис1тр
ди2ф1р
1ді
ді2ало
ді2а1с
діг2н
ді1д
ді1з
дій1ш
ді1м
2д1і2ме
2д1інс
ді2ор
ді1от
ді1р2в
ді1шл
д1й
2д3к2
дко1с2
д1л
д3ли
д1м
2дма
2дмі
2д1н
дне2сл
3д2ніп
1до
доа2
до1брат
добс1
до2вс
до3в2че
до2гн
до3д2
до1з
доз2б
доз2л
доз2м
дої2
дої3т
док2р
доо2
доп2
допо1
до1с
до3св
дос2л
дос2н
до2со
до3с2п
до2с1тан
дот2р
до1х2р
дош2
2д1п2
д1р
2др.
д3ра.
д3ри.
д2рип
д3різ
дро3к2
д3ромн
1д2роч
д3ру.
д2руг
дрюч2ч
2д1с2
дст2ре
д1т2
1д2тс
1ду
дуп1л
2д1уро
ду2роч
дус1т
д1ф
д1х
д1ц
2дце
2дці
2д1ч
2д1ш2
3дшн
дш3ту
д1щ
2дь.
1дьг
1дьз
1дьк
1дьм
1дьо
3дьс
1дьц
1дя
дя1д
д'1
д'2єк
д'ї2
д'я2
е1а
еа2би
еабия2
еа2де
еа2те
еб1р
еб2рех
е1в
е3в2б
е3в2г
ев2да
ев2ди
ев2же
еви1с
евит1
е2вм
е3в2ми
ев2п
ев2ра
е2вс
е3в2си
евт2
е3в2ті
ев2том
е3в2тр
е2вч
ег2ні
ег2ра.
е1ґ
е1дво
е2дек
ед2з
е1дза
е1дзв
е2д1іс
е2дл
едо1
едоб2
едо2ск
ед2рук
е2д1у2м
ед1у2чо
е1е2
еек1
е1є
е1ж
е2жц
еза2й
езас1
еза2с3т
ез2би
ез1в
езг3ра
езк3л
е2з1ог
е2зоп
ез1о2р
езу2м
ез1у2п
ез1ус
е1зь
е1і
е1ї
е2йми
ей2мо
е1йня
ек1в
1екз
ек1р
ек2ред
ек3рі
ек1ст
е2кт
е2кц
е1л
еле1г
ело1
е2льк
е3льш
е3ля
е1м
еми1с
ем2кн
е2мр
е2мх
енав3ч
ена2п3р
енг2
ене1о
ензоо2
ео2ба
ео2бе
еоб1р
е1о2г1л
еог2н
ео2д3р
еое2
е1о2зор
еок2
е1о2ков
е1оле
е1о2ль
е1оля
е1омо
е1он
еоп2
ео2пал
е1о2пе
е1о2под
е1ор
ео1с
е1о2св
еос1вя
е1о2см
ео2ся
еот2
ео2ха
ео2хо
ео2ці
е1о2ч
е1пі
епі1с2
епо2т3р
еп3ри.
епри2й
е2пс
е1ра
е1рбс
ердос2
ере2дос
ере1к
ере1т2
ери2вч
ери1ск
е2рін
ерку3
еск1л
е1с2к3р
е2ску
е1с2лі
е1с2ма
есп1л
ес2пр
е1стар
ест1р
ес1тре
ест2рі
ес1тро
ес2тям
е1та
ета1с
е2тв
ет2во
е1т2ну
ет1р
етран3
ет2ре
етрос2
е2тс
е2тх
е1ть
е1у
еу2б
еу2в
еу2г
еу2к1
еу2п
еу2х
еу2ц
еу2ч
еуш2
е1ф
е2фл
е2фн
еф2ре
е1х2л
ех3ли
ех1о2г1
е1х2р
е1ч
е2чл
е2шки
еш2ко
еш3т
е1щ
е1я
ея2к
2є1б
є1в
є3ва
2єві
2євм
є2вр
євс1
1єг
є2ге
є2ду
2є1ж
2є1з2
1єк
є1кр
є1л
є2ль
1ємн
1є1му
2є1о
є1п
2єпо
2єпр
єпри2к
єпри2с
є1ра
1єрг
2є1с2л
єс1т1
є1т
єт2в
є2тк
є2тн
є2тц
2є1у
єук1
жа2бл
1жак
ж1а2ме
2ж1а2п
2ж1б2
ж2ва
ж1ві
ж2гу
2ж1д2
ж2дь
2ж1ж
2ж1з
1жи
жи2вч
1жі
жі1о
2ж1к
2ж1л
ж2лу
2ж1м
жми2к3
ж3мл
2ж1н
1жо
жо2вч
жо2т
ж1р
2ж1с
2ж1уп
жу2пр
ж1ц
2ж1ч
ж1ш2
1за
заб2
за1в2д
за1вс
за3в2ч
за3г2
за1д2в
за1др
2заєм
заз2
за1й2д
за1йм
за1йня
за1й2т
за1й2ш
за1к2
2з1акт
з1алк
за3мко
зант2р
зап2
за1р2в
за1с2
за3т2
2з1а2ф
за3ш2
з2баг
зб2л
з1бра
з1б2ре
з1б2ри
з1б2рі
2зв.
з2ват
з2вем
з2вет
з2веш
зви2кл
з2вич
з2віс
з1вор
з1г2
2зд.
з1дв
з3дк
з2дор
з3дц
1зе
3земн
з1ж
2з1з2
1зи
зи2гл
3зир
зит2р
1зі
зі1б2
зіг2
зі1д2
3зіє
зі1з
3зії
зі1й2д
зі1й2т
зі1й2ш
зі3к
зі1м2
зі3мл
з1інс
з1інт
зі1п2
зі1с
зі1т2
3зія
1з2й
2з3к2
зк3н
з1л
з2лоб
з1м2
з2міш
з3мн
1з2на
зна1дв
знайш2
зне1к2
2зни
3з2ниж
з3ний
з2нищ
2зно
2зню
1зо
зо1б2л
зоб1р
зо2г1л
3зод
зо1з2
зок2в
зок2р
з1окс
зо2оп
з1о2п1л
зос2л
2з1о2со
зот2
зо3тл
зоф2
зо1х2
з1п2
зпро2к1
з1р
з2ра.
2зрах
з2ри.
2зрит
2зриш
з2ріє
з2ріл
з2рін
з2ріт
з2рію
зрос1
2зрю.
з2рюван
з1с2
з1т2
зт3в
1зу
3зу.
зу2ль
зу1ст2
з1ф
з1х2
2з1ц
з1ч
з1ш
з2шив
з1щ
2зь.
1зьб
2зьб.
1зьк
1зю
1зя
2зял
з'1яд
и1а
и1б
иб2лу
иб2р
и2бц
и1в
и2вд
иви2з
и2вс
ив2че
ив2чу
и1г
и2гн
и3г2но
и3го
и2гро
и2гря
и4гт
и1ґ
и1д
ид2б
ид2ві
и2дл
и3д2лу
ид2му
ид2р
и2д3ра
и2дри.
и2д3рі
и1є
иє2д
и1жа
иж3в
и1же
и3жл
и1жу
из2би
и1зв
из2ве
и1зд
из2мат
и1з2р
и1зь
и1з'
и1и
и1і
и1ї
и1й2д
и1йм
ий2с
и1й2т
и1й2ш
и1к
и3ка
ик2в
и2кль
и2кн
и3ко
ико1б2
ик2р
ик4рі
и2кт
и3ку
и2кц
и1л
и1м
и3м2но
им2рі
и3м2сі
им2х
и1н
ина2ст
и2нб
инк2ре
и1о2
и1п
ип2лек
и2пля
и2п3н
и3по
ипрос1
и2пс
и1р
и2рв
и2рд
ири1с2
и3рі
ирос1т
иск2
и2скув
и1с2лав
и1с2м
ис2пи
ис2пл
ис2са
ис2се
ис2су
и1стам
ис2тін
ист1р
ис3х
и1сь
и1т
ит2ве
ит2ві
и2тк
и3ткн
и2тл
и2тн
ит2ре
ит2рі
и2тс
и2тц
ит2че
ит2чі
и1у2
и1ф
и2фн
и1х
их2л
и2хн
их2р
и2хт
и1ц
ич2т
иш2кі
ишк3р
иш2ли
иш2лю
иш2ма
и2шн
иш2ту
и1щ
и1ю
и1я
ия2м
ия2р
і1а
і2агр
і2аме
і2афі
іа2фр
іа1х2
ібо1
іб1р
іб'1я
і2в1ав
ів1арк
іви2з
і1ві
і3вів
ів1ім
і1во
і2в1о2б
іво2к
ів1ока
і2в1о2с
і1ву
і2в1уча
і1вя
і1г
і2гв
іг1л
іг2ло
іг2на
іг2не
ігні1
і2гре
і2гри
і2гс
і3да
ід1в
і2дек
ід1жа
і2джм
іді1б2
іді1сл
ідіс1т
іді1т2
ідо1
ідоб2
і2д1ос
і2д1ох
і1е2
іе3з
і1є
і1жа
і1же
і1жу
і1з2в
із1д
і1з2л
ізо1с
1ізот
і1зь
і1ї
і1к
і2кб
і2к1в
ік1л
і2кн
і2кр
ік3рі
ік1с
і2кт
і2кф
і2кц
і1л
іл1а2м
і3ллє
і2льк
і3льо
і2льр
і2льц
і2льч
і1мі
імп1л
і1м2р
і1му
іне1г
інк2
іно1с
іноу3
інс2п
інс2та
інс2ц
інт2ро
1інф
і1ньк
ін'1
іо1б2
і1од
і1оз
іої2
і1олу
і1ома
і1оми
і1он
і1опт
і1ор
і1ос.
іот2
і1оти
іо1х2
і1пі
іпод3р
іп3ро
іп3ря
і1ра
ір2ве
ір2ву
іро1
ірої2
і1рь
і3ря
іс3ко
іск3р
іс1м
ісо1
іс2по
іс2са
і2ссю
іс1т1р
і2сть
і2стю
і1та
і2тв
іт1емі
іт2нет
іто3в
іт1р
і2тс
і1тьо
і1у
іу2рі
і1ф
і2хв
іх2то
і1ц
і2шк
іш2ле
іш2лю
і1щ
і1ю
і1я
ія2де
ія2ке
ія2кий
ія2ких
ія2кі
ія2ког
ія2кої
ї1во
ї2дан
ї1жа
ї2жо
1їз
ї2кає
ї2кат
ї2каю
ї2ку
ї1ла
ї2ло
1їм
ї1мі
ї1му
ї1ра
їс1т
ї1сь
ї1т
ї2тс
1ї2х
ї1ц
ї1щ
й1б2
й1в
й1г2
й1д
й3да
йд2ж
1йє1
й1ж
й1з
й1к
й1л
й2ль
й1м
2йм.
1ймал
й2мен
1йменн
1ймену
1ймень
й3мн
й3н
2йнятл
1йо
йо2ш
й1п
й2пф
й3пц
й1р
й1с
йс1м
йс1т
й2с1ф
й1т
й3та
йт1р
й1ф
йх2
йхс1
й1ц
й1ч
й1шну
йшо2
1йя
1ка
ка2бл
ка2бр
ка4вл
каво2с
кав3ч
ка1дз
ка2зн
ка2пл
ка2пн
ка2п3р
3кас
кас1т
2каф
к1б
2к3ват
квес1
к1вя
2к1г
2к1д
1ке
2кеа
кес1т
к1ж
2к1з
1ки
2киг
ки2гл
ки2пл
ки2сл
1кі
2кід
кі2ль
кі1о
2кіп
кі2п3ру
2к3к
2кл.
к1лаз
к2лей
2клем
к2леп
2клив
к2лин
к3лів
к2лім
к2лін
к2літ
кло1б
к2лоз
к3лос
2к1лу
к2ль
2кль.
к2люч
2кля.
к1м
к2мета
к2мети
к1н
к2ниж
1ко
ко1бл
ко2б3ра
ко3в2ж
ко2вр
ко2гн
коза2с
ко1з2б
ко1з2м
ко1зш
колі2є
3копи
3копл
ко2см
ко1с2н
ко1с2п
кос1т
ко2т3р
кош2к
ко2шл
ко2шт
к1рав
к1рам
к2ратн
к1раш
1креа
1кред
к2ри
к3ри.
кри2пл
крис1
к3риф
к3риц
2к3рич
к2рі
к3рім
к3рін
к2руч
к2рю
2кс
к3са
ксе2ль
ксі1
кс3к
к1ска
к1скр
к1сн
ксп1л
кс1т
к2сте
кст1р
к1сь
к3т
2кт.
кт1р
ктро1
1ку
кудо2
ку2ль
кус1т
к1ф
2к1х2
к1ц
2к1ч
2к1ш2
к1щ
1ла.
ла2бл
1лаг
ла2дц
ла2зн
1лами
1ламн
ла2пн
1лася
2л1б
2л1в
2л1г
2л1ґ
2л1д
1ле
ле2в3р
ле1д2р
ле1зб
ле1ско
ле1сп
ле3тв
леус1
2лє
2л1ж
2л1з
1ли
2либ
ли2бл
ли4вл
ли2вч
ли2зн
3лий
ли2пл
лис1т
ли2тв
ли2хв
1лі
3лі.
ліа2м
лі3в2о
ліво3б
лі2ль
лі1сп
лі2тем
лі1х2р
2л3к
лк1в
2л1л
л2ль
л2ляв
л2лял
л1м
2л1н
1ло
ло1б2р
2лобу
ло2вм
ло2вч
лог2
ло1йм
ло2кв
ло2кл
лок2р
лоо3к
ло2рал
ло2р1е2т
лос2л
лос2п
ло2тв
ло2шк
л1п
2л1с2
2л1т
1лу.
1луа
1лув
1лує
1лун
1лую
2л3ф2
2л1х
лх1в
2л1ц
2л1ч
2ль.
2льб.
1льв
1льг
1льд
1льє
1льз
1льй
1льк
2льк.
1льм
2льм.
2льн.
1льо
3льп
4льп.
2льс.
1льси
1льсо
1льст
1льсу
2льсь
3лься
1льт
2льт.
2льтр.
2льф.
1льц
1льч
3льчи
2льш
1лью
1лья
1лю
2люсл
2люсн
2люсо
1ля.
1ляє
ля1сл
1ляю
1ма
ма2гл
мало1
малос2
ман3дц
ма1ста
маф2
2м1б
м3ба
м2бль
мб1р
2м1в
2м3г
2м1д
1ме
ме2доб
ме2д1о2г1
3менш
м1ж
2м1з
1ми
ми2сл
ми2тр
міг1р
мі2жа
1мій
мі1ок
мі1ом
мі1оц
1міч
м1к
2мка
2мки
2мкі
2мко
мк1р
2мку
2м1л
мле1т2
м2ль
2м1м
2м1н
мна2с
3м2нож
м3нос
1мо
мо3вд
мо3вп
мо2вс
мо2вч
мо1з2б
мо1з2в
мо1з2м
мої2
мо2кв
мо2кл
молодо2
мома1
моо2
мо1сп
мост2
мос1ф
мо2шк
2м3п
мп3р
2м1ра
м2ре
2мри
2мро
2мрю
2м1с
м2сти
2м1т
3м2тс
1му.
мус1т
2м1ф
мфі1
2м1ц
2м1ч
2м1ш
2мщи
1мя
1м'2
1на
3на.
наб2л
наб2ра
на3вг
на1в2д
на3вк
на3вл
на3вм
на1вп
на1вр
нав2чу
на3вш
на3г2
3над
наз2
назо2
най1ш
на1к
3нали
нао2
нап2
на1р2в
нарос1
3на1с
нас2к
нас2п
нат2ра
на3т2ру
на1х2
на1ш2
3нают
н1б
2н1в
2н3г
нго1
нг2ру
н1ґ
2н1д
нд2ж
нд2з
н3дн
н3дсп
н2дт
н3дцем.
н3дці
1не
не1б2л
нев2д
не3вж
не3в2ч
не1гл
нег3рі
не1д2
не1з2
неї2
не1йм
не1кв
не1о2б
не1од
нео2ну
не1опа
не1о2с
не1ох
не1оц
не1п
неп2л
не1ск
не1сл
не1с2п
не1стя
не2сх
не3т2в
не1т2л
не1т2р
не2фр
не1шк
нея2
1нє
н1ж
2н1з
1ни
3ник
ни2кл
ни2тв
1ні
ні1б2
ні2ла
2німо
2н1інс
нінс3п
ні1о
ні1п
2н1ісл
ні1хт
2н1к
нк1л
н2км
н2кн
нко1б2
нко1з2
нко1с2
нк1р
н3кса
нку3л
н1л
нля3
н1м
2н1н
н3н2і
1но
3но.
но1б2р
но3в2ж
но2вч
но1зв
но1з2д
но3кн
нок2р
но1ско
нос2л
но1с2п
ност2
но2с3ті
нос2то
но3тк
2н1отц
2н1отч
ноут4в
но3ф2
но1х2
но2чв
нош2к
н1п
н1р
2н1с
н2с1аг
н2с1ак
нс1арк
н2с3в
н2ск
н2слі
нс2ло
н2с1м
н2с1ок
н2сс
нс1т
нс2тал
нс2тк
нст1р
н3су.
нсу2р
нс1ура
н2с1ф
2н1т
3н2тв
нтик2
нто2к
нт1ра
н2тр1аг
нтр1ата
нт2ре
нт2род
н2тс
н3тст
1ну
2нуто
2нуш
н1ф
нф2р
2н1х2
2н1ц
2н1ч
2н1ш
нш2т
н1щ
2нь.
1ньб
1ньг
1ньє
1ньї
1ньй
2ньк.
1ньм
2ньма
1ньо1
ньос2
1ньс
1ньц
1ньч
2ньч.
1ньш
1нью
1нья
1ню
ню3р
2нюч.
1ня
1н'
о1а
оа2зі
оа2м
оа2н
оа2п
оа2р
оас1
оа2т
1обг
1обґ
